morphology/HUN/HUN.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [N] [V] [ADJ] [COMP] [SUPER] [POSS] [1P] [2P] [3P] [OSG] [OPL] [SSG] [SPL] [SG] [PL] [ACC] [NOM] [DAT] [ALL] [ABL] [INS] [CAU] [TRA] [TER] [ESSF] [ESSM] [INE] [SUP] [ADE] [ILL] [SUB] [ELA] [DEL] [FOR] [DIS] [SOC] [TEM] [DIST] [PRES] [FUT] [PST] [PART] [SUBJ] [OBJ] [INDI] [COND] [IMPE] [INFI] [ITOYOU] [IMPR] [POTE] [CAUS] [BIR]

LEXICON ADJ_morf

[ADJ]:0 ADJ_morf2;

LEXICON ADJ_morf2

           ADJ_morf3;
[COMP]:+Abb ADJ_morf3;

LEXICON ADJ_morf3

[SG]:0 	#;
[PL]:+Ak #;
[ADV]:+An #;

LEXICON N_morf

[N]:0 	N_morf2 ;

LEXICON N_morf2

[SG]:0 	N_case;
[PL]:+Ak N_case;
[POSS]:0  N_morf3;

LEXICON N_morf3

[1P][SSG][OSG]:+Pm    N_case;
[1P][SSG][OPL]:+Aim   N_case;
[2P][SSG][OSG]:+Pd    N_case;
[2P][SSG][OPL]:+Aid   N_case;
[3P][SSG][OSG]:+JA    N_case;
[3P][SSG][OPL]:+JAi    N_case;
[1P][SPL][OSG]:+Unk   N_case;
[1P][SPL][OPL]:+Aink  N_case;
[2P][SPL][OSG]:+AtAk  N_case;
[2P][SPL][OPL]:+AitAk N_case;
[3P][SPL][OSG]:+Uk   N_case;
[3P][SPL][OPL]:+JAik   N_case;


Lexicon N_case

[NOM]:0 	#;
[ACC]:+At 	#;
[DAT]:+nAk 	#;
[ALL]:+hOz 	#;
[ABL]:+tOl 	#;
[INS]:+vAl	#;
[CAU]:+ért	#;
[TRA]:+vA	#;
[TER]:+ig	#;
[ESSF]:+ként	#;
[ESSM]:+Ul	#;
[INE]:+bAn	#;
[SUP]:+On	#;
[ADE]:+nAl	#;
[ILL]:+bA	#;
[SUB]:+rA	#;
[ELA]:+bOl	#;
[DEL]:+rOl	#;
[FOR]:+képp	#;
[FOR]:+képpen	#;
[DIS]:+Anként	#;
[SOC]:+Astul	#;
[TEM]:+kor	#;
[DIST]:+Ant	#;	
[BIR]:+é        #;

LEXICON V_morf

[V]:0          V_morff;
[V][POTE]:+hAt V_morff;
[V][CAUS]:+tAt V_morff;

LEXICON V_morff

[INDI][PRES]:0 V_morf2 ;
[INDI][PST]:+T V_PST;
[PART]:0 V_morf3 ;
[COND]:0 V_morf4 ;
[IMPE]:0 V_morf5 ;
[INFI]:0 V_morf6 ;

LEXICON V_morf2

[1P][SG][SUBJ]:+Ok 	#;
[1P][SG][OBJ]:+Om 	#;
[1P][PL][PRES][SUBJ]:+Unk 	#;
[1P][PL][PRES][OBJ]:+jUk 	#;
[2P][SG][PRES][SUBJ]:+Sl 	#;
[2P][SG][PRES][OBJ]:+Od 	#;
[2P][PL][PRES][SUBJ]:+tOk 	#;
[2P][PL][PRES][OBJ]:+jÁtok 	#;
[3P][SG][PRES][SUBJ]: 		#;
[3P][SG][PRES][OBJ]:+ja 	#;
[3P][SG][PST][SUBJ]:+T 	#;
[3P][SG][PST][OBJ]:+tA 		#;
[3P][PL][PRES][SUBJ]:+nAk 	#;
[3P][PL][PRES][OBJ]:+ják 	#;
[ITOYOU][PRES]:+lAk		#;

LEXICON V_PST

[1P][SG][SUBJ]:+Am #;
[1P][SG][OBJ]:+Am #;
[1P][PL][SUBJ]:+Unk #;
[1P][PL][OBJ]:+Uk #;
[2P][SG][SUBJ]:+Ál #;
[2P][SG][OBJ]:+Ad #;
[2P][PL][SUBJ]:+Atok #;
[2P][PL][OBJ]:+Átok #;
[3P][SG][SUBJ]:0 #;
[3P][SG][OBJ]:+A #;
[3P][PL][SUBJ]:+Ak #;
[3P][PL][OBJ]:+ÁK #;
[ITOYOU]:+Alak #;

LEXICON V_morf3

[PST][PART]:+Ott		ADJ_morf2;
[FUT][PART]:+Andó		ADJ_morf2;
[PRES][PART]:+vA		#;

LEXICON V_morf4

[1P][SG][PRES][SUBJ]:+nék 	#;
[1P][SG][PRES][OBJ]:+nAm 	#;
[1P][SG][PST]:+tAm% volna 	#;
[1P][PL][PRES]:+nAnk 		#;
[1P][PL][PST]:+tUnk% volna	#;
[1P][PL][PST][OBJ]:+tUk% volna	#;
[2P][SG][PRES][SUBJ]:+nAl 	#;
[2P][SG][PRES][OBJ]:+nAd 	#;
[2P][SG][PST][SUBJ]:+tAl% volna 	#;
[2P][SG][PST][OBJ]:+tAd% volna 	#;
[2P][PL][PRES][SUBJ]:+nAtok% volna	#;
[2P][PL][PST][SUBJ]:+tAtOk% volna #;
[3P][SG][PRES][SUBJ]:+nA	#;
[3P][SG][PRES][OBJ]:+nÁ 	#;
[3P][SG][PST][SUBJ]:+Ott% volna 	#;
[3P][SG][PST][OBJ]:+tA% volna	#;
[3P][PL][PRES][SUBJ]:+nÁnAk 	#;
[3P][PL][PRES][OBJ]:+nÁk 	#;
[3P][PL][PST][SUBJ]:+tAk% volna	#;
[3P][PL][PST][OBJ]:+tÁk% volna	#;
[ITOYOU][PRES]:+nÁlAk		#;
[ITOYOU][PST]:+tAlAk% volna	#;

LEXICON V_morf5

[1P][SG][SUBJ]:+jAk 	#;
[1P][SG][OBJ]:+jAm 	#;
[1P][PL][SUBJ]:+jUnk 	#;
[1P][PL][OBJ]:+jUk 	#;
[2P][SG][SUBJ]:+jÁl 	#;
[2P][SG][SUBJ]:+j 	#;
[2P][SG][OBJ]:+d 	#;
[2P][SG][OBJ]:+jAd 	#;
[2P][PL][SUBJ]:+jAtok 	#;
[2P][PL][OBJ]:+jÁtok 	#;
[3P][SG][SUBJ]:+jOn	#;
[3P][SG][OBJ]:+jA 	#;
[3P][PL][SUBJ]:+jAnak 	#;
[3P][PL][OBJ]:+jÁk 	#;
[ITOYOU]:+jAlak		#;

LEXICON V_morf6

[1P][SG]:+nOm 	#;
[1P][PL]:+nunk 	#;
[2P][SG]:+nOd 	#;
[2P][PL]:+nOtok 	#;
[3P][SG]:+nia 	#;
[3P][PL]:+niuk 	#;
[ITOYOU]:+nAlak		#;
[IMPR]:+ni #;

LEXICON Root
alábbi:alábbi	ADJ_morf ;
alkotmányos:alkotmányos	ADJ_morf ;
altruista:altruista	ADJ_morf ;
ápolt:ápolt	ADJ_morf ;
asszonyos:asszonyos	ADJ_morf ;
automata:automata	ADJ_morf ;
barátságos:barátságos	ADJ_morf ;
belső:belső	ADJ_morf ;
bőbeszédű:bőbeszédű	ADJ_morf ;
búbos:búbos	ADJ_morf ;
célszerűtlen:célszerűtlen	ADJ_morf ;
csapnivaló:csapnivaló	ADJ_morf ;
csintalan:csintalan	ADJ_morf ;
dagadt:dagadt	ADJ_morf ;
derült:derült	ADJ_morf ;
divergens:divergens	ADJ_morf ;
édes:édes	ADJ_morf ;
éhes:éhes	ADJ_morf ;
eleven:eleven	ADJ_morf ;
ellentétes:ellentétes	ADJ_morf ;
energikus:energikus	ADJ_morf ;
érinthetetlen:érinthetetlen	ADJ_morf ;
esedékes:esedékes	ADJ_morf ;
évelő:évelő	ADJ_morf ;
fallikus:fallikus	ADJ_morf ;
felejthet:felejthet	ADJ_morf ;
felnőtt:felnőtt	ADJ_morf ;
fésületlen:fésületlen	ADJ_morf ;
főiskolai:főiskolai	ADJ_morf ;
főtt:főtt	ADJ_morf ;
gazdag:gazdag	ADJ_morf ;
goromba:goromba	ADJ_morf ;
gyatra:gyatra	ADJ_morf ;
hagyományos:hagyományos	ADJ_morf ;
halott:halott	ADJ_morf ;
határozatlan:határozatlan	ADJ_morf ;
hetyke:hetyke	ADJ_morf ;
hiteles:hiteles	ADJ_morf ;
hulla:hulla	ADJ_morf ;
ifjú:ifjú	ADJ_morf ;
induktív:induktív	ADJ_morf ;
írástudatlan:írástudatlan	ADJ_morf ;
izmos:izmos	ADJ_morf ;
jó:jó	ADJ_morf ;
kajás:kajás	ADJ_morf ;
katasztrofális:katasztrofális	ADJ_morf ;
kékvérű:kékvérű	ADJ_morf ;
keskeny:keskeny	ADJ_morf ;
kibogozhatatlan:kibogozhatatlan	ADJ_morf ;
királyi:királyi	ADJ_morf ;
kockás:kockás	ADJ_morf ;
kompatibilis:kompatibilis	ADJ_morf ;
korhadt:korhadt	ADJ_morf ;
kövér:kövér	ADJ_morf ;
kristályos:kristályos	ADJ_morf ;
lagymatag:lagymatag	ADJ_morf ;
legendás:legendás	ADJ_morf ;
levonható:levonható	ADJ_morf ;
magas:magas	ADJ_morf ;
matematikai:matematikai	ADJ_morf ;
megható:megható	ADJ_morf ;
meleg:meleg	ADJ_morf ;
mérgező:mérgező	ADJ_morf ;
modortalan:modortalan	ADJ_morf ;
művelhető:művelhető	ADJ_morf ;
nehezebb:nehezebb	ADJ_morf ;
nukleáris:nukleáris	ADJ_morf ;
ó:ó	ADJ_morf ;
önfejű:önfejű	ADJ_morf ;
ősi:ősi	ADJ_morf ;
otthonos:otthonos	ADJ_morf ;
pejoratív:pejoratív	ADJ_morf ;
piszkos:piszkos	ADJ_morf ;
precíz:precíz	ADJ_morf ;
püspöki:püspöki	ADJ_morf ;
reális:reális	ADJ_morf ;
rendkívüli:rendkívüli	ADJ_morf ;
rohadt:rohadt	ADJ_morf ;
rozsdamentes:rozsdamentes	ADJ_morf ;
sekélyes:sekélyes	ADJ_morf ;
soros:soros	ADJ_morf ;
stílusos:stílusos	ADJ_morf ;
szakadt:szakadt	ADJ_morf ;
szárnyú:szárnyú	ADJ_morf ;
szemetes:szemetes	ADJ_morf ;
szertartásos:szertartásos	ADJ_morf ;
színtelen:színtelen	ADJ_morf ;
szokványos:szokványos	ADJ_morf ;
szűkszavú:szűkszavú	ADJ_morf ;
tapasztalatlan:tapasztalatlan	ADJ_morf ;
tehetős:tehetős	ADJ_morf ;
téves:téves	ADJ_morf ;
tömör:tömör	ADJ_morf ;
tudományos:tudományos	ADJ_morf ;
utópisztikus:utópisztikus	ADJ_morf ;
végtelen:végtelen	ADJ_morf ;
viszkető:viszkető	ADJ_morf ;
zsibbasztó:zsibbasztó	ADJ_morf ;
adó:adó	N_morf ;
ajándék:ajándék	N_morf ;
alapvető kölcsönhatás:alapvető kölcsönhatás	N_morf ;
állás:állás	N_morf ;
amfiteátrum:amfiteátrum	N_morf ;
anyó:anyó	N_morf ;
archaizmus:archaizmus	N_morf ;
aszexuális:aszexuális	N_morf ;
aukció:aukció	N_morf ;
bakó:bakó	N_morf ;
barbár:barbár	N_morf ;
begy:begy	N_morf ;
beszédhiba:beszédhiba	N_morf ;
birsalma:birsalma	N_morf ;
bokszbajnok:bokszbajnok	N_morf ;
borotva:borotva	N_morf ;
bulvárlap:bulvárlap	N_morf ;
céllövölde:céllövölde	N_morf ;
cinkos:cinkos	N_morf ;
császár:császár	N_morf ;
csibe:csibe	N_morf ;
csökkenés:csökkenés	N_morf ;
cukorrépa:cukorrépa	N_morf ;
deista:deista	N_morf ;
dialektus:dialektus	N_morf ;
disztributivitás:disztributivitás	N_morf ;
doppingszer:doppingszer	N_morf ;
ebihal:ebihal	N_morf ;
egyirányú utca:egyirányú utca	N_morf ;
elektromosságtan:elektromosságtan	N_morf ;
ellipszoid:ellipszoid	N_morf ;
embere:embere	N_morf ;
epilepszia:epilepszia	N_morf ;
értéktőzsde:értéktőzsde	N_morf ;
esztétika:esztétika	N_morf ;
extrapoláció:extrapoláció	N_morf ;
farmernadrág:farmernadrág	N_morf ;
fejőszék:fejőszék	N_morf ;
felperes:felperes	N_morf ;
fergeteg:fergeteg	N_morf ;
flotta:flotta	N_morf ;
fókuszcsoport:fókuszcsoport	N_morf ;
forma:forma	N_morf ;
függetlenség:függetlenség	N_morf ;
fuvalom:fuvalom	N_morf ;
generáció:generáció	N_morf ;
gőg:gőg	N_morf ;
gulyás:gulyás	N_morf ;
háborús bűn:háborús bűn	N_morf ;
hangfelvétel:hangfelvétel	N_morf ;
háziasszony:háziasszony	N_morf ;
hit:hit	N_morf ;
hozzászólása:hozzászólása	N_morf ;
ima:ima	N_morf ;
ispán:ispán	N_morf ;
jerke:jerke	N_morf ;
kaméleon:kaméleon	N_morf ;
kaskavál:kaskavál	N_morf ;
kéregetés:kéregetés	N_morf ;
kiegészítő:kiegészítő	N_morf ;
koffein:koffein	N_morf ;
kontyvirág:kontyvirág	N_morf ;
körző:körző	N_morf ;
kronobiológia:kronobiológia	N_morf ;
lámpagyújtogató:lámpagyújtogató	N_morf ;
les:les	N_morf ;
macskakő:macskakő	N_morf ;
mártás:mártás	N_morf ;
menekült:menekült	N_morf ;
módosító:módosító	N_morf ;
mutáció:mutáció	N_morf ;
nemesfém:nemesfém	N_morf ;
nyersolaj:nyersolaj	N_morf ;
oltvány:oltvány	N_morf ;
ősnemzés:ősnemzés	N_morf ;
pandeizmus:pandeizmus	N_morf ;
pecsenye:pecsenye	N_morf ;
planéta:planéta	N_morf ;
prímszám:prímszám	N_morf ;
rajzszén:rajzszén	N_morf ;
rés:rés	N_morf ;
rúzs:rúzs	N_morf ;
síkság:síkság	N_morf ;
súly:súly	N_morf ;
számrendszer:számrendszer	N_morf ;
személyzet:személyzet	N_morf ;
szilícium:szilícium	N_morf ;
szörnyeteg:szörnyeteg	N_morf ;
támadás:támadás	N_morf ;
távirat:távirat	N_morf ;
termelés:termelés	N_morf ;
tollaslabda:tollaslabda	N_morf ;
tudomás:tudomás	N_morf ;
ulti:ulti	N_morf ;
vadászgörény:vadászgörény	N_morf ;
vásárlás:vásárlás	N_morf ;
viasz:viasz	N_morf ;
vonalkód:vonalkód	N_morf ;
zseb:zseb	N_morf ;
agyonüt:agyonüt	V_morf ;
alapít:alapít	V_morf ;
amputál:amputál	V_morf ;
átfésül:átfésül	V_morf ;
avanzsíroz:avanzsíroz	V_morf ;
becsuk:becsuk	V_morf ;
beint:beint	V_morf ;
bemutatkozik:bemutatkoz	V_morf ;
beteljesül:beteljesül	V_morf ;
bízik:bíz	V_morf ;
böjtöl:böjtöl	V_morf ;
borotválkozik:borotválkoz	V_morf ;
cammog:cammog	V_morf ;
csalódik:csalód	V_morf ;
csíkoz:csíkoz	V_morf ;
csöng:csöng	V_morf ;
darál:darál	V_morf ;
diagnosztizál:diagnosztizál	V_morf ;
dokumentál:dokumentál	V_morf ;
dühöng:dühöng	V_morf ;
egybevág:egybevág	V_morf ;
elbocsát:elbocsát	V_morf ;
elfelejt:elfelejt	V_morf ;
elillan:elillan	V_morf ;
elkoboz:elkoboz	V_morf ;
elmond:elmond	V_morf ;
elpárologtat:elpárologtat	V_morf ;
eltűnik:eltűn	V_morf ;
emelkedik:emelked	V_morf ;
érdemel:érdemel	V_morf ;
esdekel:esdekel	V_morf ;
fáj:fáj	V_morf ;
fejlődik:fejlőd	V_morf ;
felfrissít:felfrissít	V_morf ;
felmond:felmond	V_morf ;
felszerel:felszerel	V_morf ;
fényképez:fényképez	V_morf ;
finanszíroz:finanszíroz	V_morf ;
fogyaszt:fogyaszt	V_morf ;
forog:forog	V_morf ;
früstököl:früstököl	V_morf ;
fut:fut	V_morf ;
gondolkodik:gondolkod	V_morf ;
gyarmatosít:gyarmatosít	V_morf ;
gyűjt:gyűjt	V_morf ;
halaszt:halaszt	V_morf ;
hápog:hápog	V_morf ;
hatványoz:hatványoz	V_morf ;
hidegszik:hidegsz	V_morf ;
hozzátesz:hozzátesz	V_morf ;
igényel:igényel	V_morf ;
indexel:indexel	V_morf ;
invesztál:invesztál	V_morf ;
jár:jár	V_morf ;
jő:jő	V_morf ;
kancsalít:kancsalít	V_morf ;
képvisel:képvisel	V_morf ;
kiabál:kiabál	V_morf ;
kimegy:kimegy	V_morf ;
kivon:kivon	V_morf ;
konspirál:konspirál	V_morf ;
köt:köt	V_morf ;
lassul:lassul	V_morf ;
lejátszik:lejátsz	V_morf ;
limitál:limitál	V_morf ;
megállít:megállít	V_morf ;
megfogalmaz:megfogalmaz	V_morf ;
megkopaszt:megkopaszt	V_morf ;
megrongál:megrongál	V_morf ;
megvilágosodik:megvilágosod	V_morf ;
moralizál:moralizál	V_morf ;
növekszik:növeksz	V_morf ;
ölel:ölel	V_morf ;
összeköt:összeköt	V_morf ;
perdít:perdít	V_morf ;
próbál:próbál	V_morf ;
rak:rak	V_morf ;
renovál:renovál	V_morf ;
romlik:roml	V_morf ;
sokkol:sokkol	V_morf ;
szabályoz:szabályoz	V_morf ;
széled:széled	V_morf ;
szikrázik:szikráz	V_morf ;
születik:szület	V_morf ;
tanít:tanít	V_morf ;
tataroz:tataroz	V_morf ;
terhel:terhel	V_morf ;
tisztel:tisztel	V_morf ;
történik:történ	V_morf ;
üdvözöl:üdvözöl	V_morf ;
úszik:úsz	V_morf ;
vakációzik:vakációz	V_morf ;
véghezvisz:véghezvisz	V_morf ;
veszt:veszt	V_morf ;
villog:villog	V_morf ;
vitat:vitat	V_morf ;
zarándokol:zarándokol	V_morf ;
